Connecticut, session 2026, SB00371.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) Notwithstanding the
2 provisions of any special act, municipal charter or home rule ordinance,
3 any child under the age of twelve shall wear a personal flotation device
4 while on any public dock, wharf or pier in the state. As used in this
5 section, "personal flotation device" has the same meaning as provided
6 in 33 CFR 175.13, as amended from time to time.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
PS Joint Favorable
SB371 / File No. 299 1

SB371 File No. 299
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $
Department of Energy and GF – Minimal Cost Up to $10,000
Environmental Protection
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill will result in a minimal cost in FY 27, of up to $10,000, to the
Department of Energy and Environmental Protection (DEEP). The cost
is associated with the purchase of additional personal flotation devices,
to support educational programs run by DEEP. Under the bill, personal
floatation devices will be required for all children under 12 years old,
while on any public dock, wharf, or pier in the state. Additionally, DEEP
will require new signage at public docks, wharfs and piers, to inform
the public of the required change.
The Out Years
There will be minimal outyear costs associated with the replacement
of personal flotation devices.
SB371 / File No. 299 2

SB371 File No. 299
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 371
AN ACT ESTABLISHING A PERSONAL FLOTATION DEVICE
REQUIREMENT FOR CHILDREN UNDER THE AGE OF TWELVE
WHILE ON PUBLIC DOCKS, WHARVES AND PIERS.